Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-217
Scenic byway designations.

(1) The Department of Transportation may designate portions of the state highway system as a scenic byway when the highway corridor possesses unusual, exceptional, or distinctive scenic, historic, recreational, cultural, or archeological features. The department shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations establishing the procedure and criteria to be utilized in making scenic byway designations.

(2) Any portion of a highway designated as a scenic byway which is located within the limits of any incorporated municipality shall not be designated as part of the scenic byway, except when such route possesses intrinsic scenic, historic, recreational, cultural, or archaeological features which support designation of the route as a scenic byway.

Laws 1995, LB 264, § 11;

Laws 2017, LB339, § 98.